Washington statutes.
RCW 18.110.900

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to any work of fine art accepted on consignment on or after July 26, 1981. If a work of fine art is accepted on consignment on or after July 26, 1981 under a contract made before that date, this section applies only to the extent that it does not conflict with the contract.

[ 1981 c 33 s 5.]